ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2c	Y	18	
SFX	2c	أ	ئينه/CcCgCkh0X0	أ
SFX	2c	ا	ينه/CcCgCkh0X0	ا
SFX	2c	0	ينه/CcCgCkh0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2c	أ	ئيه/CcCoCsh0X0	أ
SFX	2c	ا	يه/CcCoCsh0X0	ا
SFX	2c	0	يه/CcCoCsh0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2c	أ	آنه/CcCgCkh0X0	أ
SFX	2c	ا	وانه/CcCgCkh0X0	ا
SFX	2c	0	انه/CcCgCkh0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2c	أ	آه/CcCoCsh0X0	أ
SFX	2c	ا	واه/CcCoCsh0X0	ا
SFX	2c	0	اه/CcCoCsh0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2c	أ	ؤونه/CcCgCkh0X0	أ
SFX	2c	ا	ونه/CcCgCkh0X0	ا
SFX	2c	0	ونه/CcCgCkh0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2c	أ	ؤوه/CcCoCsh0X0	أ
SFX	2c	ا	وه/CcCoCsh0X0	ا
SFX	2c	0	وه/CcCoCsh0X0	[^أا]

#أنتن
SFX	3c	Y	4	
SFX	3c	ن	نه/CcCgCkCoCsh0X0	ن
SFX	3c	أ	أنه/CcCgCkCoCsh0X0	أ
SFX	3c	ا	ونه/CcCgCkCoCsh0X0	ا
SFX	3c	0	نه/CcCgCkCoCsh0X0	[^نأا]

#هو
SFX	4c	Y	5	
SFX	4c	أ	ؤه/CdChClh0X0	أ
SFX	4c	أ	أه/CdCpCth0X0	أ
SFX	4c	ا	وه/CdChClCpCth0X0	ا
SFX	4c	ا	ه/CdCth0X0	ا
SFX	4c	0	ه/CdChClCpCth0X0	[^أا]

#هو
SFX	&c	Y	1	
SFX	&c	0	ه/CdCth0X0	.

#هي
SFX	5c	Y	5	
SFX	5c	أ	ؤه/CcCgCkh0X0	أ
SFX	5c	أ	أه/CcCoCsh0X0	أ
SFX	5c	ا	وه/CcCgCkCoCsh0X0	ا
SFX	5c	ا	ه/CcCsh0X0	ا
SFX	5c	0	ه/CcCgCkCoCsh0X0	[^أا]

#هي
SFX	$c	Y	1	
SFX	$c	0	ه/CcCsh0X0	.

#هما
SFX	6c	Y	12	
SFX	6c	أ	آنه/CdChClh0X0	أ
SFX	6c	ا	وانه/CdChClh0X0	ا
SFX	6c	0	انه/CdChClh0X0	[^أا]
SFX	6c	أ	آه/CdCpCth0X0	أ
SFX	6c	ا	واه/CdCpCth0X0	ا
SFX	6c	0	اه/CdCpCth0X0	[^أا]
SFX	6c	أ	آنه/CcCgCkh0X0	أ
SFX	6c	ا	وانه/CcCgCkh0X0	ا
SFX	6c	0	انه/CcCgCkh0X0	[^أا]
SFX	6c	أ	آه/CcCoCsh0X0	أ
SFX	6c	ا	واني/CcCoCsh0X0	ا
SFX	6c	0	اني/CcCoCsh0X0	[^أا]

#هم
SFX	7c	Y	6	
SFX	7c	أ	ؤونه/CdChClh0X0	أ
SFX	7c	ا	ونه/CdChClh0X0	ا
SFX	7c	0	ونه/CdChClh0X0	[^أا]
SFX	7c	أ	ؤوه/CdCpCth0X0	أ
SFX	7c	ا	وه/CdCpCth0X0	ا
SFX	7c	0	وه/CdCpCth0X0	[^أا]

#هن
SFX	8c	Y	4	
SFX	8c	ن	نه/CdChClCpCth0X0	ن
SFX	8c	أ	أنه/CdChClCpCth0X0	أ
SFX	8c	ا	ونه/CdChClCpCth0X0	ا
SFX	8c	0	نه/CdChClCpCth0X0	[^نأا]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	1d	Y	3	
SFX	1d	0	ه/DaDeDiDmDqh0X0	.
SFX	1d	0	ه/DbDfDjDnDrh0X0	.
SFX	1d	0	ه/DcDgDkDoDsh0X0	.

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	?d	Y	3	
SFX	?d	0	ه/DaDqh0X0	.
SFX	?d	0	ه/DbDrh0X0	.
SFX	?d	0	ه/DcDsh0X0	.

#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2d	Y	6	
SFX	2d	0	ينه/DcDgDkh0X0	.
SFX	2d	0	يه/DcDoDsh0X0	.
SFX	2d	0	انه/DcDgDkh0X0	.
SFX	2d	0	اه/DcDoDsh0X0	.
SFX	2d	0	ونه/DcDgDkh0X0	.
SFX	2d	0	ون/DcDoDsh0X0	.

#أنتن
SFX	3d	Y	2	
SFX	3d	ن	نه/DcDgDkDoDsh0X0	ن
SFX	3d	0	نه/DcDgDkDoDsh0X0	[^ن]

#هو
SFX	4d	Y	1	
SFX	4d	0	ه/DdDhDlDpDth0X0	.

#هو
SFX	&d	Y	1	
SFX	&d	0	ه/DdDth0X0	.

#هي
SFX	5d	Y	1	
SFX	5d	0	ه/DcDgDkDoDsh0X0	.

#هي
SFX	$d	Y	1	
SFX	$d	0	ه/DcDsh0X0	.

#هما
SFX	6d	Y	4	
SFX	6d	0	انه/DdDhDlh0X0	.
SFX	6d	0	اه/DdDpDth0X0	.
SFX	6d	0	انه/DcDgDkh0X0	.
SFX	6d	0	اه/DcDoDsh0X0	.

#هم
SFX	7d	Y	2	
SFX	7d	0	ونه/DdDhDlh0X0	.
SFX	7d	0	وه/DdDpDth0X0	.

#هن
SFX	8d	Y	2	
SFX	8d	ن	نه/DdDhDlDpDth0X0	ن
SFX	8d	0	نه/DdDhDlDpDth0X0	[^ن]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	1e	Y	15	
SFX	1e	ى	يه/EaEeEiEmEqh0X0	ى
SFX	1e	ي	اه/EaEeEiEmEqh0X0	ي
SFX	1e	ى	ه/EaEqh0X0	ى
SFX	1e	ي	ه/EaEqh0X0	ي
SFX	1e	0	ه/EaEeEiEmEqh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	1e	ى	يه/EbEfEjEnErh0X0	ى
SFX	1e	ي	اه/EbEfEjEnErh0X0	ي
SFX	1e	ى	ه/EbErh0X0	ى
SFX	1e	ي	ه/EbErh0X0	ي
SFX	1e	0	ه/EbEfEjEnErh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	1e	ى	يه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	ى
SFX	1e	ي	اه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	ي
SFX	1e	ى	ه/EcEsh0X0	ى
SFX	1e	ي	ه/EcEsh0X0	ي
SFX	1e	0	ه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	[^يى]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	?e	Y	3	
SFX	?e	0	ه/EaEqh0X0	.
SFX	?e	0	ه/EbErh0X0	.
SFX	?e	0	ه/EcEsh0X0	.

#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2e	Y	18	
SFX	2e	ى	ينه/EcEgEkh0X0	ى
SFX	2e	ي	ينه/EcEgEkh0X0	ي
SFX	2e	0	ينه/EcEgEkh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2e	ى	يه/EcEoEsh0X0	ى
SFX	2e	ي	يه/EcEoEsh0X0	ي
SFX	2e	0	يه/EcEoEsh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2e	ى	يانه/EcEgEkh0X0	ى
SFX	2e	ي	يانه/EcEgEkh0X0	ي
SFX	2e	0	انه/EcEgEkh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2e	ى	ياه/EcEoEsh0X0	ى
SFX	2e	ي	ياه/EcEoEsh0X0	ي
SFX	2e	0	اه/EcEoEsh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2e	ى	ونه/EcEgEkh0X0	ى
SFX	2e	ي	ونه/EcEgEkh0X0	ي
SFX	2e	0	ونه/EcEgEkh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2e	ى	وه/EcEoEsh0X0	ى
SFX	2e	ي	وه/EcEoEsh0X0	ي
SFX	2e	0	وه/EcEoEsh0X0	[^يى]

#أنتن
SFX	3e	Y	4	
SFX	3e	ن	نه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	ن
SFX	3e	ى	ينه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	ى
SFX	3e	ي	ينه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	ي
SFX	3e	0	نه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	[^نيى]

#هو
SFX	4e	Y	5	
SFX	4e	ى	يه/EdEhElEpEth0X0	ى
SFX	4e	ي	اه/EdEhElEpEth0X0	ي
SFX	4e	ى	ه/EdEth0X0	ى
SFX	4e	ي	ه/EdEth0X0	ي
SFX	4e	0	ه/EdEhElEpEth0X0	[^يى]

#هو
SFX	&e	Y	1	
SFX	&e	0	ه/EdEth0X0	.

#هي
SFX	5e	Y	5	
SFX	5e	ى	يه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	ى
SFX	5e	ي	اه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	ي
SFX	5e	ى	ه/EcEsh0X0	ى
SFX	5e	ي	ه/EcEsh0X0	ي
SFX	5e	0	ه/EcEgEkEoEsh0X0	[^يى]

#هي
SFX	$e	Y	1	
SFX	$e	0	ه/EcEqh0X0	.

#هما
SFX	6e	Y	12	
SFX	6e	ى	يانه/EdEhElh0X0	ى
SFX	6e	ي	يانه/EdEhElh0X0	ي
SFX	6e	0	انه/EdEhElh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	6e	ى	ياه/EdEpEth0X0	ى
SFX	6e	ي	ياه/EdEpEth0X0	ي
SFX	6e	0	اه/EdEpEth0X0	[^يى]
SFX	6e	ى	يانه/EcEgEkh0X0	ى
SFX	6e	ي	يانه/EcEgEkh0X0	ي
SFX	6e	0	انه/EcEgEkh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	6e	ى	ياه/EcEoEsh0X0	ى
SFX	6e	ي	ياه/EcEoEsh0X0	ي
SFX	6e	0	اه/EcEoEsh0X0	[^يى]

#هم
SFX	7e	Y	6	
SFX	7e	ى	ونه/EdEhElh0X0	ى
SFX	7e	ي	ونه/EdEhElh0X0	ي
SFX	7e	0	ونه/EdEhElh0X0	[^يى]
SFX	7e	ى	وه/EdEpEth0X0	ى
SFX	7e	ي	وه/EdEpEth0X0	ي
SFX	7e	0	وه/EdEpEth0X0	[^يى]

#هن
SFX	8e	Y	4	
SFX	8e	ن	نه/EdEhElEpEth0X0	ن
SFX	8e	ى	ينه/EdEhElEpEth0X0	ى
SFX	8e	ي	ينه/EdEhElEpEth0X0	ي
SFX	8e	0	نه/EdEhElEpEth0X0	[^نيى]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	1f	Y	21	
SFX	1f	أ	ؤه/FaFeFih0X0	أ
SFX	1f	أ	أه/FaFmFqh0X0	أ
SFX	1f	ئ	ؤه/FaFeFih0X0	ئ
SFX	1f	ئ	أه/FaFmFqh0X0	ئ
SFX	1f	ى	يه/FaFeFiFmFqh0X0	ى
SFX	1f	ى	ه/FaFqh0X0	ى
SFX	1f	0	ه/FaFeFiFmFqh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	1f	أ	ؤه/FbFfFjh0X0	أ
SFX	1f	أ	أه/FbFnFrh0X0	أ
SFX	1f	ئ	ؤه/FbFfFjh0X0	ئ
SFX	1f	ئ	أه/FbFnFrh0X0	ئ
SFX	1f	ى	يه/FbFfFjFnFrh0X0	ى
SFX	1f	ى	ه/FbFrh0X0	ى
SFX	1f	0	ه/Fb	FfFjFnFrh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	1f	أ	ؤه/FcFgFkh0X0	أ
SFX	1f	أ	أه/FcFoFsh0X0	أ
SFX	1f	ئ	ؤه/FcFgFkFoFsh0	X0	ئ
SFX	1f	ئ	أه/FcFoFsh0X0	ئ
SFX	1f	ى	يه/FcFgFkFoFsh0X0	ى
SFX	1f	ى	ه/Fc	Fsh0X0	ى
SFX	1f	0	ه/Fc	FgFkFoFsh0X0	[^أئى]

#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2f	Y	24	
SFX	2f	أ	ئينه/FcFgFkh0X0	أ
SFX	2f	ئ	ئينه/FcFgFkh0X0	ئ
SFX	2f	ى	ينه/FcFgFkh0X0	ى
SFX	2f	0	ينه/FcFgFkh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2f	أ	ئيه/FcFoFsh0X0	أ
SFX	2f	ئ	ئيه/FcFoFsh0X0	ئ
SFX	2f	ى	يه/FcFoFsh0X0	ى
SFX	2f	0	يه/FcFoFsh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2f	أ	آنه/FcFgFkh0X0	أ
SFX	2f	ئ	آنه/FcFgFkh0X0	ئ
SFX	2f	ى	يانه/FcFgFkh0X0	ى
SFX	2f	0	انه/FcFgFkh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2f	أ	آه/FcFoFsh0X0	أ
SFX	2f	ئ	آه/FcFoFsh0X0	ئ
SFX	2f	ى	يآه/FcFoFsh0X0	ى
SFX	2f	0	آه/FcFoFsh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2f	أ	ؤونه/FcFgFkh0X0	أ
SFX	2f	ئ	ؤونه/FcFgFkh0X0	ئ
SFX	2f	ى	ونه/FcFgFkh0X0	ى
SFX	2f	0	ونه/FcFgFkh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2f	أ	ؤوه/FcFoFsh0X0	أ
SFX	2f	ئ	ؤوه/FcFoFsh0X0	ئ
SFX	2f	ى	وه/FcFoFsh0X0	ى
SFX	2f	0	وه/FcFoFsh0X0	[^أئى]

#أنتن
SFX	3f	Y	5	
SFX	3f	ن	نه/FcFgFkFoFsh0X0	ن
SFX	3f	أ	أنه/FcFgFkFoFsh0X0	أ
SFX	3f	ئ	أنه/FcFgFkFoFsh0X0	ئ
SFX	3f	ى	ينه/FcFgFkFoFsh0X0	ى
SFX	3f	0	نه/FcFgFkFoFsh0X0	[^نأئى]

#هو
SFX	4f	Y	7	
SFX	4f	أ	ؤه/FdFhFlh0X0	أ
SFX	4f	أ	أه/FdFpFth0X0	أ
SFX	4f	ئ	ؤه/FdFhFlh0X0	ئ
SFX	4f	ئ	أه/FdFpFth0X0	ئ
SFX	4f	ى	يه/FdFhFlFpFth0X0	ى
SFX	4f	ى	ه/FdFth0X0	ى
SFX	4f	0	ه/FdFhFlFpFth0X0	[^أئى]

#هي
SFX	5f	Y	7	
SFX	5f	أ	ؤه/FcFgFkh0X0	أ
SFX	5f	أ	أه/FcFoFsh0X0	أ
SFX	5f	ئ	ؤه/FcFgFkh0X0	ئ
SFX	5f	ئ	أه/FcFoFsh0X0	ئ
SFX	5f	ى	يه/FcFgFkFoFsh0X0	ى
SFX	5f	ى	ه/FcFsh0X0	ى
SFX	5f	0	ه/FcFgFkFoFsh0X0	[^أئى]

#هما
SFX	6f	Y	16	
SFX	6f	أ	آنه/FdFhFlh0X0	أ
SFX	6f	ئ	آنه/FdFhFlh0X0	ئ
SFX	6f	ى	يانه/FdFhFlh0X0	ى
SFX	6f	0	انه/FdFhFlh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	6f	أ	آه/FdFpFth0X0	أ
SFX	6f	ئ	آه/FdFpFth0X0	ئ
SFX	6f	ى	يآه/FdFpFth0X0	ى
SFX	6f	0	آه/FdFpFth0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	6f	أ	آنه/FcFgFkh0X0	أ
SFX	6f	ئ	آنه/FcFgFkh0X0	ئ
SFX	6f	ى	يانه/FcFgFkh0X0	ى
SFX	6f	0	انه/FcFgFkh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	6f	أ	آه/FcFoFsh0X0	أ
SFX	6f	ئ	آه/FcFoFsh0X0	ئ
SFX	6f	ى	يآه/FcFoFsh0X0	ى
SFX	6f	0	آه/FcFoFsh0X0	[^أئى]

#هم
SFX	7f	Y	8	
SFX	7f	أ	ؤونه/FdFhFlh0X0	أ
SFX	7f	ئ	ؤونه/FdFhFlh0X0	ئ
SFX	7f	ى	ونه/FdFhFlh0X0	ى
SFX	7f	0	ونه/FdFhFlh0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	7f	أ	ؤوه/FdFpFth0X0	أ
SFX	7f	ئ	ؤوه/FdFpFth0X0	ئ
SFX	7f	ى	وه/FdFpFth0X0	ى
SFX	7f	0	وه/FdFpFth0X0	[^أئى]

#هن
SFX	8f	Y	5	
SFX	8f	ن	نه/FdFhFlFpFth0X0	ن
SFX	8f	أ	أنه/FdFhFlFpFth0X0	أ
SFX	8f	ئ	أنه/FdFhFlFpFth0X0	ئ
SFX	8f	ى	ينه/FdFhFlFpFth0X0	ى
SFX	8f	0	نه/FdFhFlFpFth0X0	[^نأئى]
